Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 228 Dry Cleaning and Dyeing [Repealed]

228.010.
Construction of chapter. [Repealed.]

228.020.
Application to department to engage in business required. [Repealed.]

228.030.
Fee to engage in business. [Repealed.]

228.040.
Inspection before issuance of permit or use of structures and equipment. [Repealed.]

228.050.
Commissioner may refuse, suspend or revoke permit. [Repealed.]

228.060.
Renewal of permits. [Repealed.]

228.070.
Permits to be exhibited — Not assignable. [Repealed.]

228.080.
Location, structure and use of buildings. [Repealed.]

228.090.
Heating. [Repealed.]

228.100.
Pipes to be protected. [Repealed.]

228.110.
Lighting and electrical equipment. [Repealed.]

228.120.
Doors and windows. [Repealed.]

228.130.
Cleaning floors. [Repealed.]

228.140.
Ventilation. [Repealed.]

228.150.
Structural requirements of drying rooms. [Repealed.]

228.160.
Fire extinguishing apparatus. [Repealed.]

228.170.
Heating and spark-emitting devices prohibited, where. [Repealed.]

228.180.
Sewer connections — Floor construction. [Repealed.]

228.190.
Requirements for dry cleaning, washing, extracting and redistilling equipment. [Repealed.]

228.200.
Liquids returned to storage tanks at close of operation — Tanks to be marked. [Repealed.]

228.210.
Volatile substances, how carried. [Repealed.]

228.220.
Storage tanks for volatile substances. [Repealed.]

228.230.
Instilling or redistilling to be in fireproof room. [Repealed.]

228.240.
Storage tanks to be buried underground. [Repealed.]

228.250.
Storage tank vent pipes. [Repealed.]

228.260.
Storage tank filling pipe. [Repealed.]

228.270.
Pipes to connect tanks at top — Valve to be kept closed. [Repealed.]

228.280.
Chapter does not apply to structures in use in 1922 unless subsequently altered. [Repealed.]

228.290.
Business considered abandoned, when. [Repealed.]

228.300.
Enforcement of chapter. [Repealed.]

228.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]